Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 5 Attorneys-At-Law

Cross references. —

As to collection agencies furnishing or advertising legal services, see §

33-11-114

.

For provision prohibiting persons from engaging in the business of debt adjusting but exempting those situations involving debt adjusting in connection with the practice of law, see §

33-14-102

.

As to exemption of attorneys from provisions relative to real estate brokers and salesmen, see §

33-28-103

.

As to constitutional right of accused to counsel, see art. 1, § 10, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provision that no judge of the supreme or district courts shall act as attorney or counsellor at law, see art. 5, § 25, Wyo. Const.

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to provisions relating to city attorneys generally, see

15-4-202

.

As to county attorneys generally, see §§

18-3-102

,

18-3-301

through

18-3-304

.

As to courts generally, see title 5.

As to power of attorney of members of armed forces, see §

19-11-203

.

As to lien of attorneys on assets of clients, see §

29-1-102

.

Editor's notes. —

Sections 33-54 and 33-56 to 33-60, W.S. 1957, have been omitted from this compilation as implicitly superseded by the Disciplinary Code, Wyoming State Bar, adopted by the supreme court in 1973.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Attorney's Liability to Third Persons for Negligent Malpractice,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 379 (1967).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7 Am. Jur. 2d Attorneys at Law § 1 et seq.

Validity of municipal license, privilege or occupation tax on attorneys, 16 ALR2d 1228.

Representation of interest adverse to that of former client, 52 ALR2d 1243.

Reinstatement of attorney after disbarment, suspension, or resignation, 70 ALR2d 268.

Propriety and permissibility of judge engaging in practice of law, 89 ALR2d 886.

Compelling admission to membership in bar association, 89 ALR2d 964.

Maintenance of lawyer reference system by organization having no legal interest in proceedings, 11 ALR3d 1206.

Pardon as restoring public office or license or eligibility therefor, 58 ALR3d 1191.

Nature of legal services or law-related services which may be performed for others by disbarred or suspended attorney, 87 ALR3d 279.

Modern status of law regarding solicitation of business by or for attorney, 5 ALR4th 866.

Validity and enforceability of referral fee agreement between attorneys, 28 ALR4th 665.

Attorney's submission of dispute to arbitration, or amendment of arbitration agreement, without client's knowledge or consent, 48 ALR4th 127.

What constitutes negligence sufficient to render attorney liable to person other than immediate client, 61 ALR4th 464.

Attorney's liability, to one other than immediate client, for negligence in connection with legal duties, 61 ALR4th 615.

Attorney's misrepresentation to court of his state of health or other personal matter in seeking trial delay as ground for disciplinary action, 61 ALR4th 1216.

Attorney's personal liability for expenses incurred in relation to services for client, 66 ALR4th 256.

Negligence, inattention or professional incompetence of attorney in handling client's affairs in tax matters as ground for disciplinary action—modern cases, 66 ALR4th 314.

Negligence, inattention or professional incompetence of attorney in handling client's affairs in estate or probate matters as ground for disciplinary action—modern cases, 66 ALR4th 342.

Legal malpractice in handling or defending medical malpractice claim, 78 ALR4th 725.

Legal malpractice in defense of criminal prosecution, 4 ALR5th 273.

Disciplinary action against attorney taking loan from client, 9 ALR5th 193.

Recovery of attorneys' fees and costs of litigation incurred as result of breach of agreement not to sue, 9 ALR5th 933.

Legal malpractice: Negligence or fault of client as defense, 10 ALR5th 828.

Attorney malpractice in connection with services related to adoption of child, 18 ALR5th 892.

Legal malpractice in defense of parents at proceedings to terminate parental rights over dependent or neglected children, 18 ALR5th 902.

Excessiveness or inadequacy of attorney's fees in matters involving commercial and general business activities, 23 ALR5th 241.

Validity and construction of agreement between attorney and client to arbitrate disputes arising between them, 26 ALR5th 107.

§ 33-5-101.
State board of law examiners; appointment.

The state board of law examiners shall be appointed by the supreme court and shall hold office pursuant to rules promulgated by the supreme court.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 28, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 3305; C.S. 1910, § 957; Laws 1911, ch. 47, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 1183; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 12; R.S. 1931, § 9-101; C.S. 1945, § 2-101; W.S. 1957, § 33-39; 2018 ch. 92, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Eleventh amendment immunity. —

The board of bar examiners is an entity of the state and is entitled to immunity under U.S. Const., Amend. 11, from an action in federal court filed pursuant to 42 USCS §§ 1981 and 1983. Ware v. Wyoming Bd. of Law Examiners, 973 F. Supp. 1339, 1997 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12155 (D. Wyo. 1997), aff'd, 161 F.3d 19, 1998 U.S. App. LEXIS 33398 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1998).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, rewrote the section, which formerly read: “The state board of law examiners shall consist of five (5) members of the bar of at least five (5) years standing, who shall be appointed by the supreme court, and shall hold office for the term of three (3) years; provided, that not more than one (1) member shall be appointed from the same judicial district. In case a vacancy shall occur by death, resignation or otherwise, the same shall be filled by appointment by the court for the remainder of the term of the member whose place has become vacant. Removal of a member from the district in which he resided when appointed shall be construed as creating a vacancy.”

§ 33-5-102.
State board of law examiners; date, rules and quorum for meetings; election of officers; supreme court to prescribe rules.

The state board of law examiners shall hold at least two (2) regular meetings each year for the examination of applicants, at times and places as prescribed by rules of the supreme court. Special meetings may be held as determined by the board from time to time. At all meetings, a majority of the board constitutes a quorum. The board shall select a chairman from its membership. The supreme court shall prescribe rules not inconsistent with this act to carry out the purposes of this act for admission to the bar of this state.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 28, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 3309; C.S. 1910, § 961; C.S. 1920, § 1187; R.S. 1931, § 9-105; C.S. 1945, § 2-105; W.S. 1957, § 33-40; Laws 1980, ch. 16, § 1; 2015 ch. 162, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted “and secretary” following “select a chairman” in the fourth sentence, deleted the fifth sentence which read: “All examinations shall be in writing upon questions prepared or approved by the board,” and deleted “and secure a system of uniform examination” following “purposes of this act” near the end of the last sentence.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

§ 33-5-103.
State board of law examiners; compensation.

The members of the state board of law examiners shall be compensated and reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as determined by the supreme court.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 28, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 3311; C.S. 1910, § 963; Laws 1911, ch. 47, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 1189; Laws 1921, ch. 37, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 9-107; C.S. 1945, § 2-107; W.S. 1957, § 33-41; Laws 1973, ch. 179, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 75, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “mileage allowance as allowed to state employees for attending the meetings and performing the duties incumbent upon them as members of the board” in the first sentence.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “be compensated and reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as determined by the supreme court” for “receive as compensation ten dollars ($10.00) for each day necessarily employed in attending the meetings of the board, and shall also receive per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii).
The expenses of the board and its members in the performance of their duties and the compensation of its members shall be paid out of the state treasury upon an itemized voucher duly verified and accompanied by a certificate signed by a majority of the members of the board showing that the expense has been actually and properly incurred in the performance of the duties devolving upon the board, or that the compensation has been duly earned, as the case may be. Upon the presentation of the voucher and certificate, the auditor shall draw his warrant upon the treasurer for the amount thereof in favor of the proper person. However, the aggregate expenditures and salaries of the state board of law examiners shall not exceed the amount of revenue collected by the board.”

§ 33-5-104.
Applications for admission to bar; generally.

All applications for admission to the bar of this state shall be made by petition to the supreme court. The same shall be referred to the state board of law examiners, who shall examine the applicant vouching his qualification for admission to the bar. The said board shall report its proceedings in the examination of applicants to the supreme court with their recommendation in the premises. If the court shall then find the applicant to be qualified to discharge the duties of an attorney and to be of good moral character, and worthy to be admitted, an order shall be entered admitting him to practice in all the courts of this state.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 28, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 3306; C.S. 1910, § 958; C.S. 1920, § 1184; R.S. 1931, § 9-102; C.S. 1945, § 2-102; W.S. 1957, § 33-42.

Drafting wills as practice of law. —

Preparation and drafting wills for other persons as a business and giving legal advice regarding same is to be regarded as practice of law. State ex rel. Wyoming State Bar v. Hardy, 61 Wyo. 172, 156 P.2d 309,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1945).

And unauthorized practice. —

Evidence was substantial to support findings that law clerk engaged in unauthorized practice of law by drafting of wills and answering questions which would require services of trained lawyer in answering accurately. State ex rel. Wyoming State Bar v. Hardy, 61 Wyo. 172, 156 P.2d 309,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1945).

Even though done under lawyer's direction. —

Layman who obtained necessary data from parties who desired wills and other legal instruments drafted, and submitted information to lawyer and under latter's direction, using forms approved by him, prepared final drafts of such instruments, engaged in unauthorized practice of law. State ex rel. Wyoming State Bar v. Hardy, 61 Wyo. 172, 156 P.2d 309,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1945).

Cited

in

Meyer v. Norman, 780 P.2d 283,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1989); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Casper, 2014 WY 22,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Feb 19, 2014); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Stinson, 2014 WY 134,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Oct. 29, 2014); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Casper, 2014 WY 22,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Feb 19, 2014); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Casper, 2014 WY 22, 2014 Wyo. LEXIS 27 (Feb 19, 2014).

Stated in

Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Richard, 2014 WY 98,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 114

, 2014 WL 3778285 (Aug 1, 2014).

Law reviews. —

“Legal Advice by Accountants,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 166.

“Communism Versus State Bar Admission,” 12 Wyo. L.J. 39 (1957).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Procedural due process requirements in proceedings involving applications for admission to bar, 2 ALR3d 1266.

Criminal record as affecting applicant's moral character for purposes of admission to the bar, 88 ALR3d 192.

Violation of draft laws as affecting character for purposes of admission to the bar, 88 ALR3d 1055.

Attorney's liability under state law for opposing party's counsel fees, 56 ALR4th 486.

Jury: who is lawyer or attorney disqualified or exempt from service, or subject to challenge for cause, 57 ALR4th 1260.

§ 33-5-105.
Applications for admission to bar; qualifications of applicants.

No one shall be admitted to the bar of this state who shall not be an adult of good moral character who has been awarded a juris doctor degree from a law school accredited by the American Bar Association.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 28, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 3307; C.S. 1910, § 959; C.S. 1920, § 1185; Laws 1927, ch. 26, § 1; 1931, ch. 73, § 13; R.S. 1931, § 9-103; C.S. 1945, § 2-103; W.S. 1957, § 33-41; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1991, ch. 112, § 1; 2015 ch. 162, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote this section.

Section violative of equal protection. —

This section, insofar as it permits only citizens of the United States to be admitted to the bar of this state, is violative of the equal protection clause of the fourteenth amendment to the constitution of the United States.State v. State Bd. of Law Exmrs., 601 P.2d 174,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1979).

Law reviews. —

See “Commission Versus State Bar Admission,” 12 Wyo. L.J. 39 (1957).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of statutes or rules conditioning right to practice law upon residence or citizenship, 53 ALR3d 1163.

Failure to pay creditors as affecting applicant's moral character for purposes of admission to the bar, 4 ALR4th 436.

Sexual conduct or orientation as ground for denial of admission to bar, 21 ALR4th 1109.

Falsehoods, misrepresentations, impersonations, and other irresponsible conduct as bearing on requisite good moral character for admission to bar, 30 ALR4th 1020.

Validity, construction and application of enactment, implementation or repeal of formal educational requirement for admission to the bar, 44 ALR4th 910.

Failure to pay creditors as affecting applicant's moral character for purposes of admission to the bar, 108 ALR5th 289.

§ 33-5-106.
Applications for admission to bar; fees; disposition of fees.

Every applicant for admission to the bar of this state shall pay a fee as set by the supreme court. On payment of one (1) fee by applicants for admission by examination the applicant shall be entitled to two (2) examinations when the second is applied for not later than one (1) year after having taken the first. All money shall be received and collected as provided by law. The state treasurer shall place the money to the credit of a separate account. Interest earned by the account shall be retained in the account.
All money within the account is continuously appropriated to the state board of law examiners and shall be applied to the direct and indirect costs of administering attorney admissions and other regulatory functions pursuant to rules promulgated by the supreme court.
Except as otherwise required in this chapter, itemized vouchers shall be submitted to the board’s executive director or chairman for approval.
Upon approval, a warrant for the payment of each voucher shall be issued by the state auditor for payment from the account.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 28, §§ 3, 6, 13; R.S. 1899, § 3308; C.S. 1910, § 960; Laws 1911, ch. 47, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 1186; R.S. 1931, § 9-104; Laws 1933, ch. 111, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 2-104; Laws 1957, ch. 237, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-44; Laws 1963, ch. 45, § 1; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1976, ch. 14, § 1; 1992, ch. 56, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2016 ch. 75, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “supreme court” for “Wyoming supreme court pursuant to
W.S.

33-1-201

at the time of filing the application” in the first sentence, deleted the former third sentence, which read, “The payment of the fee shall also entitle the applicant, upon being admitted, to a certificate of admission,” and added the four sentences at the end.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 33-5-107.
Applications for admission to bar; fraudulent application cause for revocation.

Any fraudulent act or presentation by an applicant in connection with his application, or examination, shall be sufficient cause for the revocation of the order admitting him to practice.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 28, § 12; R.S. 1899, § 3316; C.S. 1910, § 968; C.S. 1920, § 1194; R.S. 1931, § 9-112; C.S. 1945, § 2-112; W.S. 1957, § 33-45.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Delay in prosecution of disciplinary proceeding as defense or mitigating circumstance, 93 ALR3d 1057.

Restitution as mitigating circumstance in disciplinary action against attorney based on wrongful conduct creating liability to client, 95 ALR3d 724.

§ 33-5-108.
Bar examinations; generally.

The examination of any applicant to the bar of this state shall be conducted pursuant to rules of the supreme court.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 28, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 3310; C.S. 1910; § 962; C.S. 1920, § 1188; R.S. 1931, § 9-106; C.S. 1945, § 2-106; W.S. 1957, § 33-46; Laws 1980, ch. 16, § 1; 2015 ch. 162, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote this section.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Court review of bar examiners' decision on applicant's examination, 39 ALR3d 719.

Failed applicant's right of access to bar examination questions and answers, 57 ALR4th 1212.

Validity, under federal constitution, of state bar examination procedures, 30 ALR Fed 934.

§ 33-5-109.
Bar examinations; no assistance or advice except as permitted.

At any examination of applicants for admission to the bar, it shall be unlawful to permit the person being examined to receive, during the examination and after the questions have been submitted to the person, any assistance or advice from any other person or persons, book or memorandum except as provided by rules of the supreme court to accommodate persons with disabilities.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 28, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 3312; C.S. 1910, § 964; C.S. 1920, § 1190; R.S. 1931, § 9-108; C.S. 1945, § 2-108; W.S. 1957, § 33-47; 2015 ch. 162, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “the person” for “him” and inserted “except as provided by rules of the supreme court to accommodate persons with disabilities.”

§ 33-5-110.
Admission of foreign attorneys on motion.

Any person who may have been admitted to practice as an attorney in the highest court of any other state or territory may be admitted to the bar of this state pursuant to the rules of the supreme court for admission on motion.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 28, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 3313; C.S. 1910, § 965; C.S. 1920, § 1191; R.S. 1931, § 9-109; Laws 1933, ch. 111, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 2-109; W.S. 1957, § 33-48; Laws 1991, ch. 112, § 1; 2015 ch. 162, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote this section.

Right of foreign attorney to practice law not a vested right. —

The right of an attorney from another state to practice law in Wyoming is not a vested right under constitutional law but is a privilege to be granted by the state. Application of Stone, 77 Wyo. 1, 305 P.2d 777,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 352 U.S. 1026, 77 S. Ct. 593, 1 L. Ed. 2d 598, 1957 U.S. LEXIS 1248 (U.S. 1957), reh'g denied, 353 U.S. 943, 77 S. Ct. 818, 1 L. Ed. 2d 764 (U.S. 1957).

Good standing in courts of another state and good moral character required. —

Attorneys from other states seeking admission in Wyoming must rely upon their original certificates of admission elsewhere and satisfy Wyoming supreme court that they are in good standing as attorneys in courts of the other states and that they are of good moral character. State Bd. of Law Examiners v. Brown, 53 Wyo. 42, 77 P.2d 626,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1938).

Exclusive jurisdiction of supreme court. —

The state supreme court has exclusive jurisdiction under this section to determine a petition of an attorney to practice law in this state. Application of Stone, 77 Wyo. 1, 305 P.2d 777,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 352 U.S. 1026, 77 S. Ct. 593, 1 L. Ed. 2d 598, 1957 U.S. LEXIS 1248 (U.S. 1957), reh'g denied, 353 U.S. 943, 77 S. Ct. 818, 1 L. Ed. 2d 764 (U.S. 1957).

Applied

in

Mt. Rushmore Broad., Inc. v. Statewide Collections, 2002 WY 39, 42 P.3d 478,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and effect of reciprocity provisions for admission to bar of attorney admitted to practice in another jurisdiction, 51 ALR2d 1198.

Disbarment or suspension of attorney in one state as affecting right to continue practice in another state, 81 ALR3d 1281.

Validity, construction, and effect of reciprocity provisions for admission to bar of attorney admitted to practice in another jurisdiction, 14 ALR4th 7.

What constitutes “unauthorized practice of law” by out-of-state counsel, 83 ALR5th 497.

§ 33-5-111.
Attorneys admitted pro hac vice to try pending case.

Members of the bar of any other state, district or territory of the United States, who may be employed as counsel in any case pending before any of the courts of this state, may be admitted pro hac vice for all the purposes of the case in which they are so employed, by the court before which said case is pending, pursuant to rules of the supreme court.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 28, § 10; R.S. 1899, § 3314; C.S. 1910, § 966; C.S. 1920, § 1192; R.S. 1931, § 9-110; C.S. 1945, § 2-110; W.S. 1957, § 33-49; 2015 ch. 162, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted “pro hac vice” and substituted “pursuant to rules of the supreme court” for “without examination.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and effect of statute or court rule requiring nonresident attorney to employ, or associate with himself, local counsel, 45 ALR2d 1065.

Frequency of appearance of out-of-state attorney as affecting right to admission for particular case, 61 ALR3d 264.

Attorney's right to appear pro hac vice in state court, 20 ALR4th 855.

Attorneys: revocation of state court pro hac vice admission, 64 ALR4th 1217.

What constitutes “unauthorized practice of law” by out-of-state counsel, 83 ALR5th 497.

§ 33-5-112.
Oath of attorney.

No person shall be deemed admitted to the bar until he shall have taken and filed an oath as provided in this section. The oath shall be to the effect that he will support, obey, and defend the constitution of the United States, and the constitution and laws of this state, and that he will faithfully and honestly and to the best of his ability discharge the duties of an attorney and counselor-at-law. The oath may be administered by the clerk or one (1) of the justices of the supreme court, a district judge in his district or the clerk of court in his county. The oath may be administered in another state or territory of the United States by a judge or justice of a court of general jurisdiction or an appellate court. The oath shall be reduced to writing, signed by the person taking, and certified to by the officer administering the same and filed in the office of the clerk of the supreme court.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 28, § 14; R.S. 1899, § 3317; C.S. 1910, § 969; C.S. 1920, § 1195; R.S. 1931, § 9-113; C.S. 1945, § 2-113; W.S. 1957, § 33-50; 2015 ch. 162, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted “and filed”, “as provided in this section. The oath shall be”, deleted “in or out of court, or by”, substituted “The oath may be administered in another state or territory of the United States by a judge or justice of a court of general jurisdiction or an appellate court. The oath” for “; and when not taken in the supreme court in open session the same” and eliminated the last sentence which read “If taken in open court the journal shall show that fact. No practicing attorney shall be taken on any official bond, or bond in any legal proceeding in the district in which he may reside.”

Repealing clauses. —

Section 15, ch. 28, Laws 1899, reads: “Sections 119, 120, 121, 122, 123, 124 and 125 of the Revised Statutes of 1887, relating to attorneys at law, be and the same are hereby repealed.”

Foreign attorney cannot recover for services rendered in Wyoming. —

An attorney admitted to the state of Washington, the District of Columbia and the United States supreme court, having rendered services to a Wyoming attorney who had been suspended, in an effort to reduce the period of suspension, sued to recover the balance due on the contract price fixed for such service. He could not recover because he had not been admitted to practice in Wyoming. Harriman v. Strahan, 47 Wyo. 208, 33 P.2d 1067,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1934).

No estoppel. —

Where plaintiff invoked doctrine of estoppel on ground that defendant knew that he had not been admitted to practice in Wyoming, court held that estoppel did not apply because agreement void as against public policy cannot be rendered valid by invoking doctrine of estoppel. Harriman v. Strahan, 47 Wyo. 208, 33 P.2d 1067,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1934).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Commission Versus State Bar Admission,” see 12 Wyo. L.J. 39 (1957).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of governmental requirement of oath of allegiance or loyalty as applied to attorneys, 18 ALR2d 268.

§ 33-5-113.
Disbarment or power of courts to punish not affected.

Nothing in this act contained shall be construed to deprive the courts of this state, or any of them, of the power as at present existing, of disbarring or otherwise punishing members of the bar.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license to practice law for failure to pay child support, the Wyoming state bar shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. The order shall be forwarded to the Wyoming supreme court for final action. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 28, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 3315; C.S. 1910, § 967; C.S. 1920, § 1193; R.S. 1931, § 9-111; C.S. 1945, § 2-111; W.S. 1957, § 33-51; 1997, ch. 128, § 2.

Cited

in

Meyer v. Norman, 780 P.2d 283,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Restitution as mitigating circumstance in disciplinary action against attorney based on wrongful conduct creating liability to client, 95 ALR3d 724.

§ 33-5-114.
Penalty for deceit or collusion.

An attorney and counselor who is guilty of deceit or collusion, or consents thereto, with intent to deceive a court or judge, or a party to an action or proceeding, or brings suit or commences proceedings without authority therefor, shall forfeit to the injured party treble damages, to be recovered in a civil action.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 6, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 128; R.S. 1899, § 3319; C.S. 1910, § 971; C.S. 1920, § 1197; R.S. 1931, § 9-115; C.S. 1945, § 2-114; W.S. 1957, § 33-52; 2015 ch. 162, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted “is liable to be disbarred, and.”

Collusion not shown. —

Summary judgment was properly granted for the two defendant attorneys in an action alleging a violation of the statute where (1) the plaintiff was represented in a divorce proceeding by one of the attorneys and the plaintiff's wife was represented by the other attorney, (2) the attorneys had a previous partnership, (3) the attorney who represented the plaintiff's wife filed a sanctions motion against the attorney who represented the plaintiff that was withdrawn, (4) the two attorneys negotiated a settlement agreement that the plaintiff rejected, and (5) the attorney who presented the plaintiff then withdrew his representation; the plaintiff failed to submit evidence of an agreement between the attorneys to defraud him or injure his reputation or evidence from which one could logically and reasonably infer from the established facts that an agreement existed. Bender v. Phillips, 8 P.3d 1074,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 2000), reh'g denied,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. Aug. 22, 2000).

Dismissed for failure to state a claim. —

Client's claim under this section against an attorney was dismissed for failure to state a claim under Wyo. R. Civ. P. 12(b)(6) because her averments in her complaint made it clear that the attorney's alleged conduct did not occur when she was a party to an existing judicial action or proceeding.
Bangs v. Schroth, 2009 WY 20, 201 P.3d 442,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2009).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Delay in prosecution of disciplinary proceeding as defense or mitigating circumstance, 93 ALR3d 1057.

Restitution as mitigating circumstance in disciplinary action against attorney based on wrongful conduct creating liability to client, 95 ALR3d 724.

Liability of attorney, acting for client, for malicious prosecution, 46 ALR4th 249.

Imposition of sanctions upon attorneys or parties for miscitation or misrepresentation of authorities, 63 ALR4th 1199.

§ 33-5-115.
[Repealed.]

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 6, § 7; R.S. 1887, § 137; R.S. 1899, § 3328; C.S. 1910, § 977; C.S. 1920, § 1203; R.S. 1931, § 9-121; C.S. 1945, § 2-115; W.S. 1957, § 33-53; repealed by 2015 ch. 162, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 33-5-116.
Payment of annual license fee; fiscal year of state bar.

All members of the state bar shall pay to the treasurer of the state bar, as a license fee for the ensuing year, an annual license fee in an amount to be established by the board of commissioners of the Wyoming state bar pursuant to the bylaws of the state bar. Honorary and retired members may be exempted completely from the payment of any fees or allowed to pay less than the regular license fee in the discretion of the board of commissioners. Fees shall constitute a fund to be held and disbursed by the treasurer upon order of the board.

The fiscal year of the state bar shall be from October 1 through September 30.

History.

C.S. 1945, § 2-406; Laws 1957, ch. 212, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-55; Laws 1965, ch. 166, § 2; 1973, ch. 188, § 1; 1976, ch. 12, § 1; 2001, ch. 112, § 1; 2015 ch. 162, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a), deleted “by the second week of October” inserted “an annual license fee in” and substituted “the bylaws of the state bar” for “W.S.

33-1-201

.”

History of section. —

This section originated as Rule 5 of the Rules of the Supreme Court Relating to the Wyoming State Bar. It appeared in the Compiled Statutes of 1945 as § 2-406, and as such was amended by the legislature in § 1, ch. 212, Laws 1957. See also present Rule 4 of the Bylaws of the Wyoming State Bar.

Legal Periodicals. —

ARTICLE: REGULATION OF THE PRACTICE OF LAW IN WYOMING: A 150-YEAR WALK THROUGH THE HISTORY BOOKS, 19 Wyo . L. Rev. 1 (2019)

Cited

in

Meyer v. Norman, 780 P.2d 283,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1989).

Legal Periodicals. —

ARTICLE: REGULATION OF THE PRACTICE OF LAW IN WYOMING: A 150-YEAR WALK THROUGH THE HISTORY BOOKS, 19 Wyo . L. Rev. 1 (2019)

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Delay in prosecution of disciplinary proceeding as defense or mitigating circumstance, 93 ALR3d 1057.

Restitution as mitigating circumstance in disciplinary action against attorney based on wrongful conduct creating liability to client, 95 ALR3d 724.

Validity of state or municipal tax or license fee upon occupation of practicing law, 50 ALR4th 467.

§ 33-5-117.
Unauthorized practice.

It shall be unlawful, and punishable as contempt of court, for any person not a member of the Wyoming state bar to hold himself out or advertise by whatsoever means as an attorney or counselor-at-law.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 61, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-61.

Negligence.—

No private right of action existed for negligence claims alleging unauthorized practice of law and psychology, absent any indication in the statutory language that a violation would give rise to an action for damages or that a new tort duty was being created. Breen v. Pruter, 679 Fed. Appx. 713, 2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 2810 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2017).

Prohibition of this section is inclusive

and clearly encompasses the attorney who once was a member in good standing but who has been disbarred for disciplinary reasons, or who, for any reason, has withdrawn from the bar or allowed his membership to lapse. Meyer v. Norman, 780 P.2d 283,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1989).

Unauthorized practice of law. —

Supreme court approved and adopted the recommendations of the Committee on the Unauthorized Practice of Law that a resident be enjoined from engaging in the unauthorized practice of law, pay restitution, and pay a fine because the Committee found that a resident engaged in the unauthorized practice of law by preparing a trust, preparing and recording a quitclaim deed, purporting to convey real property from clients’ living trust to the trust, and preparing a general power of attorney. Unauthorized Practice of Law Comm. v. Stock, 2020 WY 16, 456 P.3d 1234,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2020).

Cited

in

Dewey Family Trust v. Mountain W. Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co., 3 P.3d 833,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Claims adjusting as engaging in practice of law, 9 ALR2d 797.

Tax matters, services in connection with, as practice of law, 9 ALR2d 797.

Validity of will drawn by layman who, in so doing, violated criminal statute forbidding such activities by one other than licensed attorneys, 18 ALR2d 918.

Drafting, or filling in blanks in printed forms, of instruments, relating to land by real estate agents, brokers or managers as constituting practice of law, 53 ALR2d 788.

Trust company's acts as fiduciary as practice of law, 69 ALR2d 404.

Title examination activities by lending institution, insurance company or title and abstract company as illegal practice of law, 85 ALR2d 184.

Business of debt adjusting as practice of law, 95 ALR2d 1354.

Handling, preparing, presenting or trying workmen's compensation claims or cases as practice of law, 2 ALR3d 724.

Representation of another before state public utilities or service commission as involving practice of law, 13 ALR3d 812.

Activities of law clerks as illegal practice of law, 13 ALR3d 1137.

Drafting of will or other estate planning activities as illegal practice of law, 22 ALR3d 1112, 71 ALR3d 1000.

Operations of collection agency as unauthorized practice of law, 27 ALR3d 1152.

What activities of stock or security broker constitute unauthorized practice of law, 34 ALR3d 1305.

Sale of books or forms designed to enable laymen to achieve legal results without assistance of attorney as unauthorized practice of law, 71 ALR3d 1000.

Prepaid legal services plans, 93 ALR3d 199.

Layman's assistance to party in divorce proceeding as unauthorized practice of law, 12 ALR4th 656.

Contracts by organizations in business of providing evidence, witness, or research assistance to legal counsel in specific litigation, 15 ALR4th 1255.

Activities of insurance adjusters as unauthorized practice of law, 29 ALR4th 1156.

Disciplinary action against attorney for aiding or assisting another person in unauthorized practice of law, 41 ALR4th 361.

What constitutes “unauthorized practice of law” by out-of-state counsel, 83 ALR5th 497.

What constitutes unauthorized practice of law by paralegal, 109 ALR5th 275.

Unauthorized practice of law — Real estate closings, 119 ALR 5th 191.

Drafting of will or other estate-planning activities as illegal or unauthorized practice of law. 25 A.L.R.6th 323.